Maryland, session 2026, SB0161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1015.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “ACCEPTED ENTRANCE DOCUMENT” MEANS A VALID
VETERAN IDENTIFICATION CARD, A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR OTHER STATE–ISSUED
LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT INDICATES THE HOLDER IS A VETERAN, OR
ANY OTHER FORM OF IDENTIFICATION ACCEPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT
ESTABLISHES THE HOLDER’S:
(1) VETERAN STATUS; OR
(2) FORMER MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD STATUS IF THE HOLDER
WAS DISCHARGED OR RELEASED UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE.
(B) On presentation of [a valid veteran identification card, a driver’s license that
indicates the license holder is a veteran, or any other form of identification accepted by the
Department that establishes the holder’s veteran status] AN ACCEPTED ENTRANCE
DOCUMENT BY AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) [A veteran] THE INDIVIDUAL may enter a State park without paying
any day–use entry fee that has been established; and
– 1 –

Ch. 337 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A vehicle of which [a veteran] THE INDIVIDUAL is an occupant may
enter a State park without paying any per–vehicle fee that has been established.
[(b)] (C) This section does not exempt [a veteran or other] AN individual from
paying any other facility use services fees not described in subsection [(a)] (B) of this
section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –